Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.120

Political activity prohibited.

No organization for emergency management established under the authority of this chapter shall participate in any form of political activity, nor shall it be employed directly or indirectly for political purposes.

[ 1984 c 38 s 12; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 14; 1951 c 178 s 14.]